Massachusetts, session 194th, H5343.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. (a) Notwithstanding section 17 of chapter 138 of the General Laws the
licensing authority of the town of South Hadley may grant: (i) 4 additional licenses for the sale
of all alcoholic beverages to be drunk on the premises pursuant to section 12 of said chapter 138;
and (ii) 2 additional licenses for the sale of all alcoholic beverages not to be drunk on the
premises pursuant to section 15 of said chapter 138 to establishments located within the 4
economic development zones described in subsection (b) upon approval of and under conditions
set by the licensing authority of the town of South Hadley. A license granted under this act shall
be clearly marked on its face either “Route 202 & 33”, “Village Commons”, “South Hadley
Falls”, or “Newton Street/Lyman Street” as applicable, and subject to all of said chapter 138
except said section 17.
(b) The licensing authority shall restrict the licenses authorized in this act to
establishments located with either the town’s: (i) “Route 202 & 33” district, (ii) “Village
Commons” district, (iii) “South Hadley Falls” district, or (iv) “Newton Street/Lyman Street”
of 2

district, as those areas are designated on a map entitled “South Hadley Zoning Map” produced by
the town of South Hadley’s Clerk’s Office and dated February 19, 2026, a copy of which is on
file in the office of the town clerk of the town of South Hadley.
(c) A license granted pursuant to clause (i) of subsection (a) shall only be exercised in the
dining room of a common victualler and other such public rooms or areas as may be deemed
reasonable and appropriate by the licensing authority as certified in writing.
(d) The licensing authority shall not approve the transfer of a license granted pursuant to
this act to a location outside of its initial zoned area as described in clause (i), (ii), (iii), or (iv) of
subsection (b), but it may grant such license to a new applicant within such initial zoned area if
the applicant files with the licensing authority a letter from the department of revenue and a letter
from the department of unemployment assistance indicating that the license is in good standing
with those departments and that all applicable taxes, fees and contributions have been paid.
(e) If a licensee terminates or fails to renew a license granted under this section or any
such license is cancelled, revoked or no longer in use, it shall be returned physically, with all of
the legal rights, privileges and restrictions pertaining thereto, to the licensing authority and the
licensing authority may then grant the license to a new applicant under the same conditions as
specified in this act.
(f) All licenses granted under this act shall be issued within 3 years after the effective
date of this act; provided, however, that a license originally granted within that time period may
be granted to a new applicant under subsections (d) or (e) thereafter.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon its passage.
of 2